Missouri, session 2026, SB1712.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 386, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 386.381 and 386.620,
to read as follows:
386.381. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, all ratemaking determinations by the
commission shall be just and reasonable and shall also be
based upon a finding that any change in a utility rate will
not be unduly burdensome to the current affordability of
utility services to customers. For purposes of this
section, "just and reasonable", as it relates to a utility
rate or charge, shall mean that the rate or charge shall
result in the lowest possible ratepayer impact that is
necessary for the utility to provide safe and adequate
service.
386.620. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri public service
commission;
(2) "Public utility", the same as defined in section
386.020.

SB 1712 2
2. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to
the contrary, any public hearing by the commission held for
the receipt of evidentiary testimony from members of the
public for purposes of a general rate proceeding shall be
subject to the following requirements:
(1) At least one local public hearing shall be
reasonably close to the residence of each utility customer
located within the geographical area served by the public
utility proposing a rate increase in the general rate
proceeding;
(2) Notice of the local public hearing shall be mailed
to the physical address of every utility customer under
subdivision (1) of this subsection by first class mail and
shall be mailed at least fourteen days prior to the hearing;
(3) Any affected ratepayer from the proposed rate
increase in the general rate proceeding may testify at the
public hearing and may file statements regarding the subject
matter of the hearing with the person or persons conducting
the hearing;
(4) Any testimony or filed statements shall become
part of the commission's evidentiary record during the
general rate proceeding under this section;
(5) The commission shall give each member of the
public a reasonable amount of time to testify before the
commission during the public hearing; and
(6) In the general rate proceeding, the final order of
the commission shall include findings that describe how the
commission's decision was impacted by the testimony and
comments received from members of the public during the
public hearing.
✓